Colorado, session 2026A, HB1397.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 29-5-302, amend
(11)(a)(II) and (11)(a)(III) as follows:
29-5-302. Required benefits - conditions of receiving benefits -
repeal.
(11) (a) (II) The general assembly shall appropriate three hundred
thousand dollars for the state fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2024, five
hundred thousand dollars for the state fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2025,
six hundred fifty thousand dollars for the state fiscal year beginning on July
1, 2026, and one million dollars for the state fiscal year beginning on July
1, 2027, from the general fund to the department of local affairs to reduce
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

participating employer contributions for volunteer firefighters and part-time
firefighters. Money appropriated pursuant to this subsection (11)(a)(II) shall
be first used to reduce participating employer contributions for volunteer
firefighters and the remainder shall be first used for part-time firefighters
and any remaining amounts may then be used for full-time firefighters.
(III) Subsection (11)(a)(II) of this section is repealed, effective July
1, 2028.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 29-5-604, amend
(3)(a)(I)(A); and repeal (3)(a)(I)(C) as follows:
29-5-604. Employer participation in health trust required -
cardiovascular screening for peace officers - repeal.
(3) (a) (I) The general assembly shall appropriate money from the
general fund or any other authorized source to the division of criminal
justice within the department of public safety for the purpose of reimbursing
a multiple employer health trust for the direct costs of providing a program
as required by this part 6 as follows:
(A) For the state fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2024, the general
assembly shall appropriate two hundred thousand dollars from the general
fund to the division of criminal justice in the department of public safety to
be used for the purpose set forth in this subsection (3)(a)(I);
(C) For the state fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2026, the general
assembly shall appropriate three hundred fifty thousand dollars from the
general fund to the division of criminal justice in the department of public
safety to be used for the purpose set forth in this subsection (3)(a)(I);
SECTION 3. Appropriation - adjustments to 2026 long bill.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, to implement this
act, appropriations made in the annual general appropriation act for the
2026-27 state fiscal year to the department of local affairs for use by the
division of local government are adjusted as follows:
(a) The general fund appropriation for firefighter heart and
circulatory malfunction benefits is decreased by $150,000; and
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1397

(b) The reappropriated funds appropriation from the firefighter
benefits cash fund created in section 29-5-302 (11)(a), C.R.S., for
firefighter heart and circulatory malfunction benefits is decreased by
$150,000.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, to
implement this act, the general fund appropriation made in the annual
general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department
of public safety for use by the division of criminal justice for first responder
employer health benefit trusts is decreased by $100,000.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not require a reduction of an
appropriation in the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state
fiscal year if:
(a) The amount of the general fund appropriation made in the annual
general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department
of local affairs for use by the division of local government for firefighter
heart and circulatory malfunction benefits is less than the amount of the
adjustment required in subsection (1)(a) of this section;
(b) The amount of the reappropriated funds appropriation from the
firefighter benefits cash fund created in section 29-5-302 (11)(a), C.R.S.,
made in the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal
year to the department of local affairs for use by the division of local
government for firefighter heart and circulatory malfunction benefits, is less
than the amount of the adjustment required in subsection (1)(b) of this
section; or
(c) The annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal
year does not include an appropriation to the department of local affairs for
use by the division of local government for firefighter heart and circulatory
malfunction benefits.
(4) Subsection (2) of this section does not require a reduction of an
appropriation in the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state
fiscal year if:
(a) The amount of the general fund appropriation made in the annual
general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1397

of public safety for use by the division of criminal justice for first responder
employer health benefit trusts is less than the amount of the adjustment
required in subsection (2) of this section; or
(b) The annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal
year does not include an appropriation to the department of public safety for
use by the division of criminal justice for first responder employer health
benefit trusts.
SECTION 4. Effective date. This act takes effect upon passage;
except that section 3 of this act takes effect only if the annual general
appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year becomes law, in which
case section 3 takes effect upon the effective date of this act or of the annual
general appropriation act for state fiscal year 2026-27, whichever is later.
SECTION 5. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1397

preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1397